famli/yua-for-graph.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

%<v%>    ! Verbo

%<n%>    ! Sustantivo
%<adj%>  ! Adjetivo
%<pl%>   ! Plural
%<s_pl%>   ! Sujeto Plural

%<prx%>  ! Proximal 'this _'
%<med%>  ! Medial 'that _'
%<dst%>  ! Distal 'that _ over there'

%<incomp%> ! "ongoing incomplete"
%<past%> ! "Completed simple past"
%<perf%> ! "Completed Present Perfect"
%<subjun%> ! "Subjunctive"
%<pron%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"

%<poss_nonownership%>
%<poss_comm%>
%<poss_internal%>

%<poss%>  ! "posesivo"


%<hab%>

%<term%>

%<neg%>

%<s_sg1%>
%<s_sg2%>
%<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%>
%<s_pl2%>
%<s_pl3%>

%<o_sg1%>
%<o_sg2%>
%<o_sg3%>
%<o_pl1%>
%<o_pl2%>
%<o_pl3%>


%<tv%>            !
%<iv%>            ! 

%<attr%>          ! Attributive
%<der_l%>         ! Adjective derivation
%<term%>          ! Terminative morpheme
%<top%>          ! Topicalized
%<loc%>           ! locative

%{o%}             ! Either 'o' or nothing
%{e%}             ! Either 'e' or nothing
%{V%}             ! Copy stem vowel

ʼ                ! Glottal, U+02BC
%>                ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
IndependentPronouns ;

LEXICON SetA
in:%<s_sg1%>%<pron%> # ;


LEXICON IndependentPronouns
SetA ;

LEXICON IntransitiveSetB
en:%<s_sg1%> Terminative ;
en:%<s_sg1%> # ;
en:%<s_sg1%> PluralPossessorSuffix ;


LEXICON PossessiveNominalSuffixes
il:%<poss_comm%> IntransitiveSetB ;
PluralNounSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON PluralNounSuffix
o'ob:%<pl%> Terminative ;
o'ob:%<pl%> # ;

LEXICON PluralPossessorSuffix
o'ob:%<pl%> Terminative ;
o'ob:%<pl%> # ;


LEXICON NounEndings
# ;
Terminative ;
PluralNounSuffix ;
IntransitiveSetB ;
PossessiveNominalSuffixes ;

LEXICON Nouns
tsíimin:tsíimin%<n%> NounEndings ; ! "caballo"

LEXICON Terminative
e':%<term%> # ;
# ;
